Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-3711
Club member; action on security; aggregate liability.

If any member shall be defrauded or aggrieved by any misconduct, wrongful act, misrepresentation, or failure of the club to render its services or fulfill its contractual obligations, such member may bring suit on the security provided in section 44-3710 in his or her own name, but the aggregate liability of the surety for all such suits shall, in no event, exceed the amount of such bond required in section 44-3709.

Laws 1981, LB 113, § 11.